Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 19. Virginia Beach Erosion Council.

§§ 10.1-1900,
10.1-1901.

Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 659.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 659, cl. 2 provides that as of July 1, 1989, the City of Virginia Beach shall be deemed successor in interest of all rights, titles and interest in and to any real or tangible personal property vested in the Virginia Beach Erosion Council.